New York, session 2025-2026, S5356.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 9112 2 to read as follows: 3 § 9112. Foreign fire insurance premiums. Notwithstanding any other 4 provision of this law or any general, special or local law to the 5 contrary, the governing body of any city, town or village may adopt by 6 local law or charter provision the repeal of any existing local law or 7 charter provision that is not in compliance with this article. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09486-01-5